Louisiana, session 2026, HB1056.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The president of the Board of Elementary and Secondary Education and
commissioner of administration, notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
are hereby authorized and empowered to convey, transfer, assign, lease or deliver any
interest, excluding mineral rights, the state may have in and to all or any portion of the
following described parcel of property:
Three parcels of land and the improvements thereon containing in the aggregate
approximately 1.16 acres, more or less, situated in Sections 40 and 43 of Township
9 North, Range 7 West, Natchitoches Parish, Louisiana, being the same property
inventoried as Louisiana State Land Office Site Code / Business Entity No.
7-35-017.
Section 2. The president of the Board of Elementary and Secondary Education and
the commissioner of administration are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements,
covenants, conditions, and stipulations and to execute such documents as necessary to
properly effectuate any conveyance, transfer, assignment, lease or delivery of title, excluding
mineral rights, to the property described in Section 1 of this Act, and as more specifically
described in any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and between the
parties, in exchange for appropriate consideration sufficient to satisfy the provisions of
Article VII, Section 14(A) of the Constitution of Louisiana. Any sale conducted pursuant
to this Act shall be in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 41:134 or 140(D).
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 1056 ENROLLED
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2